District of Columbia statutes.
31-2304

Authorization and execution of domestication agreement.

(a)

A domestication agreement shall be authorized, adopted, approved, executed, and acknowledged by the Non-U.S. insurer under the laws of the country where it is organized.

(b)

A domestication agreement shall also be approved, adopted, and authorized by the acquiring insurer’s board of directors, executed by its president or any vice president, and attested by its secretary or assistant secretary under its corporate seal, or, in the case of a foreign insurer, as otherwise provided in the laws of the state of its organization.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-194, § 5, 47 DCR 7427